California statutes. Insurance Code
(a) On behalf of an insurer or self-insured person, company, association, or group.

(b) Pursuant to, and within the scope of, a certificate of consent issued pursuant to Section 3702.1 of the Labor Code or pursuant to, and within the scope of, a license issued pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 14020) of Chapter 1 of Division 5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 452.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

750.5.

Nothing in Section 750 of the Insurance Code, Section 549 of the Penal Code, or Section 3215 of the Labor Code shall be construed to prevent an attorney or law firm from the following:

(a) Dividing fees for legal services with a lawyer under circumstances expressly permitted by Rule 2-200 of the Rules of Professional Conduct of the State Bar. 

(b) Offering or giving an incidental nonmonetary gift or gratuity to a person who has made a recommendation resulting in the employment of the attorney or law firm, provided that the gift or gratuity was not offered in consideration of any promise, agreement, or understanding that the gift or gratuity would be forthcoming or that referrals would be made or encouraged in the future. 

(c) Offering or giving a bonus to an employee who has made a referral or recommendation resulting in the employment of the attorney or law firm, provided that the bonus was not offered in consideration of any promise, agreement, or understanding that the bonus would be forthcoming or that referrals or recommendations would be made or encouraged in the future.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 120, Sec. 2.7.   Effective July 16, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

753.

(a) It is unlawful for any insurance agent or broker, or any insurance solicitor employed thereby, to receive any financial benefit from an automobile repair facility or any other form of direct or indirect consideration from any person for referring insureds to that person or that person’s designee for vehicle repairs covered under the automobile comprehensive coverage, property damage coverage, or automobile collision coverage, of an insurance policy issued through the insurance agent or broker or by an insurer represented by the insurance agent.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies with respect to commercial and noncommercial policies of automobile insurance.

(c) For purposes of this section, “financial benefit” means the receiving of any commission or gratuity, discount on repair costs, free repairs, or employment by a repair facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 372, Sec. 1.   Effective September 12, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

754.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to solicit, receive, offer, or pay any referral fee for the referral of an individual for the furnishing of services or goods for which the person knows or should have known whole or partial reimbursement is or may be made, directly or indirectly, by any insurer. As used in this section, a referral fee is a fee paid by a person furnishing goods or services to another in return for the referral of an individual to that person for the furnishing of services or goods. It includes any referral fee, kickback, bribe, or rebate, whether made directly or indirectly, overtly or covertly, or in cash or in kind. This subdivision does not apply to any of the following:

(1) Discounts or similar reductions in prices.

(2) Referral fees between attorneys if legal services are provided pursuant to a contingency fee arrangement if any referral fee is consistent with the Rules of Professional Conduct of the State Bar of California.

(b) This section applies to all forms of insurance covering a motor vehicle, including commercial and personal lines, and comprehensive coverage, property damage coverage, collision coverage, and liability coverage.

(c) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation. Proceedings to enforce this section may be brought by any district attorney or other prosecuting attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 255, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.1. Unlawful Practices [755. - 758.7.]

755.

If at the time of the solicitation and issuance of a policy of life or disability insurance, or of a surety bond which by its terms continues until canceled, a person may lawfully receive commissions on it, that person, or in the event of that person’s death, his or her estate or heirs may continue to receive commissions on it during the continuance in force or renewal of the policy or bond without being licensed under the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621) of Part 2 if all of the following requirements are met:

(a) The recipient does not transact insurance in connection with the policy or bond while not so licensed.

(b) The payment is made pursuant to a contract entered into, before that solicitation and issuance, between the insurer paying or allowing the commission and that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1099, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

756.

When the premium on a policy insuring an employer is based upon the amount or segregation of the employer’s payroll, and the employer, personally or knowingly through his or her employee, procures a lower premium by willfully misrepresenting the amount or segregation, that misrepresentation is an unlawful act as to the employer.

In addition to any penalty provided by law, the employer in that case is liable to the state in an amount 10 times the difference between the lower premium paid and the premium properly payable. The commissioner shall collect the amount so payable and may bring a civil action in his or her name as commissioner to enforce collection unless the misrepresentation is made to, and the lower premium procured from the State Compensation Insurance Fund. In the latter case the liability to the state under this section shall be enforced in a civil action in the name of the State Compensation Insurance Fund and any amount so collected shall become a part of that fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1099, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

757.

When a statement of the amount or segregation of a payroll is materially false, and an insurer, through a person employed by it in a managerial capacity, accepts the statement as the basis for the premium on a policy, the acceptance is an unlawful act if the accepting employee knows of the falsity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1099, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

758.

(a) It is unlawful for an insurer to require an auto body repair shop registered pursuant to Sections 9884 and 9889.52 of the Business and Professions Code, as a condition of participation in the insurer’s direct repair program, to pay for the cost of an insured’s rental vehicle that is replacing an insured vehicle damaged in an accident, or to pay for the towing charges of the insured with respect to that accident. However, the insurer and the auto body repair shop may agree in writing to terms and conditions under which the rental vehicle charges become the responsibility of the auto body repair shop when the shop fails to complete work within the agreed-upon time for repair of the damaged vehicle.

(b) A registered auto body repair shop that is denied participation in an insurer’s direct repair program may report a denial to the department, which shall maintain a record of all those denials for the purposes of gathering market conduct information. An insurer, upon the request of the department, shall disclose the fact that a denial was made.

(c) Any insurer that conducts an auto body repair labor rate survey to determine and set a specified prevailing auto body rate in a specific geographic area shall report the results of that survey to the department, which shall make the information available upon request. The survey information shall include the names and addresses of the auto body repair shops and the total number of shops surveyed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 867, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

758.5.

(a) No insurer shall require that an automobile be repaired at a specific automotive repair dealer, as defined in Section 9880.1 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) (1) No insurer shall suggest or recommend that an automobile be repaired at a specific automotive repair dealer unless either of the following applies:

(A) A referral is expressly requested by the claimant.

(B) The claimant has been informed in writing of the right to select the automotive repair dealer.

(2) An insurer may provide the claimant
 with specific truthful and nondeceptive information regarding the services and benefits available to the claimant during the claims process. This may include, but is not limited to, information about the repair warranties offered, the type of replacement parts to be used, the anticipated time to repair the damaged vehicle, and the quality of the workmanship available to the claimant.

(3) If an insurer’s recommendation of an automotive repair dealer is accepted by the claimant, the insurer shall cause the damaged vehicle to be restored to its condition prior to the loss at no additional cost to the claimant other than as stated in the policy or as is otherwise allowed by law. If the recommendation of an automotive repair dealer is done orally, and if the oral recommendation is accepted by the claimant, the insurer shall provide the information contained in this paragraph, as noted in the statement below, to the claimant at the time the
 recommendation is made. The insurer shall mail or provide the notice required by this paragraph within five calendar days from the acceptance of the recommendation. The written notice required by this paragraph shall include the following statement plainly printed in no less than 10-point type in a separate and freestanding document:
“WE ARE PROHIBITED BY LAW FROM REQUIRING THAT REPAIRS BE DONE AT A SPECIFIC AUTOMOTIVE REPAIR DEALER. YOU ARE ENTITLED TO SELECT THE AUTO BODY REPAIR SHOP TO REPAIR DAMAGE COVERED BY US. WE HAVE RECOMMENDED AN AUTOMOTIVE REPAIR DEALER THAT WILL REPAIR YOUR DAMAGED VEHICLE. WE RECOMMEND YOU CONTACT ANY OTHER AUTOMOTIVE REPAIR DEALER YOU ARE CONSIDERING TO CLARIFY ANY QUESTIONS YOU MAY HAVE REGARDING SERVICES AND BENEFITS. IF YOU AGREE TO USE OUR RECOMMENDED AUTOMOTIVE REPAIR DEALER, WE WILL CAUSE THE DAMAGED VEHICLE TO BE RESTORED TO ITS CONDITION PRIOR TO THE LOSS AT NO ADDITIONAL COST TO YOU OTHER THAN AS STATED
 IN THE INSURANCE POLICY OR AS OTHERWISE ALLOWED BY LAW. IF YOU EXPERIENCE A PROBLEM WITH THE REPAIR OF YOUR VEHICLE, PLEASE CONTACT US IMMEDIATELY FOR ASSISTANCE.”

(c) Except as provided in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), or as to information of the kind authorized by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), after the claimant has chosen an automotive repair dealer, the insurer shall not suggest or recommend that the claimant select a different automotive repair dealer.

(d) Any insurer that, by the insurance contract, suggests or recommends that an automobile be repaired at a particular automotive repair dealer shall also do both of the following:

(1) Prominently disclose the contractual provision in writing to the insured at the time the insurance is applied for and at the time the claim is
 acknowledged by the insurer.

(2) If the claimant elects to have the vehicle repaired at the shop of his or her choice, the insurer shall not limit or discount the reasonable repair costs based on charges that would have been incurred had the vehicle been repaired by the insurer’s chosen shop.

(e) For purposes of this section, “claimant” means a first-party claimant or insured, or a third-party claimant who asserts a right of recovery for automotive repairs under an insurance policy.

(f) The powers of the commissioner to enforce this section shall include those granted in Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 790) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

 (g) The changes to this section made by the act enacted during the 2009–10 Regular Session that amended
 this section shall only apply to actions filed on or after January 1, 2010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 387, Sec. 1.   (AB 1200)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

758.6.

Insurers shall not engage in capping. For the purposes of this section, “capping” means offering or paying an amount that is unrelated to a methodology used in determining paint and materials charges that is accepted by automobile repair shops and insurers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 526, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

758.7.

An insurer, upon receiving notice from an insured, shall reimburse any fees and extra premium charged to an insured due to a late premium payment or a lapse in coverage under the policy if the late payment or lapse in coverage was the result of fraud committed by an agent or broker licensed pursuant to this code and one of the following has occurred:

(a) The agent or broker has been convicted of fraudulent activity in court.

(b) An administrative penalty has been imposed on the agent or broker for fraudulent activity.

(c) The agent or broker has been charged with fraud in court or in an administrative action and has agreed to plead guilty to a lesser charge for the fraudulent activity of which he or she is accused.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 160, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.2. Consumer Protection in Sales of Insurance by or Through Depository Institutions [759. - 765.]

759.

This article establishes consumer protections in connection with retail sales practices, solicitations, advertising, or offers of any insurance product or annuity to a consumer by either of the following:

(a) Any depository institution, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 760.

(b) Any person who is engaged in those activities at an office of a depository institution or on behalf of a depository institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 203, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

760.

As used in this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Affiliate” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1215.

(b) “Depository institution” means any of the following:

(1) National banks, operating subsidiaries of a national bank, and federal branches or agencies of a foreign bank, as defined in Section 1 of the International Banking Act of 1978 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 3101 et seq.), in the case of institutions supervised by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency.

(2) State member banks in the case of the Board of Governors of the
 Federal Reserve System.

(3) State nonmember banks in the case of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC).

(4) Savings associations and operating subsidiaries of savings associations, in the case of the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency.

(c) “Company” means any corporation, partnership, business trust, association, or similar organization, or any other trust, other than a trust that by its terms must terminate within 25 years or not later than 21 years and 10 months after the death of individuals living on the effective date of the trust. “Company” does not include any corporation the majority of the shares of which are owned by the United States or by any state, or a qualified family partnership, as defined in paragraph (10) of subsection (o) of Section 2 of the federal Bank Holding Company Act of
 1956, as amended (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1841(o)(10)).

(d) “Consumer” means an individual who purchases, applies to purchase, or is solicited to purchase from a covered person insurance products or annuities primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(e) “Control” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1215.

(f) (1) “Covered person” means either of the following:

(A) A depository institution.

(B) Another person only when the person sells, solicits, advertises, or offers an insurance product or annuity to a consumer at an office of a depository institution, or on behalf of a depository institution.

(2) For purposes of this definition, activities on behalf of a depository institution include activities pursuant to which a person, whether at an office of the depository institution or at another location, sells, solicits, advertises, or offers an insurance product or annuity and where at least one of the following applies:

(A) The person represents to a consumer that the sale, solicitation, advertisement, or offer of any insurance product or annuity is by or on behalf of the depository institution.

(B) The depository institution refers a consumer to a seller of insurance products or annuities and the institution has a contractual arrangement to receive commissions or fees derived from a sale of an insurance product or annuity resulting from that referral.

(C) Documents evidencing the sale,
 solicitation, advertising, or offer of an insurance product or annuity identify or refer to the depository institution.

(g) “Electronic media” includes any means for transmitting messages electronically between a covered person and a consumer in a format that allows visual text to be displayed on equipment such as a personal computer monitor.

(h) “Office” means the premises of a depository institution where retail deposits are accepted from the public.

(i) “Subsidiary” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1215.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 143, Sec. 69.   (SB 251)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

761.

(a) A covered person shall not engage in any practice that would lead a consumer to believe that an extension of credit, in violation of subsection (b) of Section 106 of the federal Bank Holding Company Act Amendments of 1970 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1972), is conditional upon either of the following:

(1) The purchase of an insurance product or annuity from the depository institution or any of its affiliates.

(2) An agreement by the consumer not to obtain, or a prohibition on the consumer from obtaining, an insurance product or annuity from an affiliated entity.

(b) A covered person shall not engage in any practice or use any advertisement at any office of, or on behalf of, the depository institution or a subsidiary of the depository institution that could mislead any person or otherwise cause a reasonable person to reach an erroneous belief with respect to any of the following:

(1) The fact that any insurance product or annuity sold or offered for sale by a covered person or any subsidiary of the depository institution is not backed by the federal government or the depository institution, or the fact that the insurance product or annuity is not insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.

(2) In the case of an insurance product or annuity that involves investment risk, the fact that there is an investment risk, including the potential that principal may be lost and that the product may decline in value.

(3) In the case of a depository institution or subsidiary of the depository institution at which insurance products or annuities are sold or offered for sale, the fact that:

(A) The approval of an extension of credit to the consumer by the depository institution or subsidiary may not be conditioned on the purchase of an insurance product or annuity by the consumer from the depository institution or a subsidiary of the depository institution.

(B) The consumer is free to purchase the insurance product or annuity from another source.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 203, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

762.

(a) In connection with the initial purchase of an insurance product or annuity by a consumer from a covered person, a covered person shall disclose to the consumer, except to the extent the disclosure would not be accurate, all of the following:

(1) That the insurance product or annuity is not a deposit or other obligation of, or guaranteed by, the depository institution or an affiliate of the depository institution.

(2) That the insurance product or annuity is not insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other agency of the United States, the depository institution, or, if applicable, an affiliate of the depository institution.

(3) In the case of an insurance product or annuity that involves an investment risk, that there is investment risk associated with the product, including the possible loss of value.

(b) In the case of an application for credit in connection with which an insurance product or annuity is solicited, offered, or sold, a covered person shall disclose that the depository institution may not condition an extension of credit on either of the following:

(1) The consumer’s purchase of an insurance product or annuity from the depository institution or any of its affiliates.

(2) The consumer’s agreement not to obtain, or a prohibition on the consumer from obtaining, an insurance product or annuity from an unaffiliated entity.

(c) (1) The disclosures required by subdivision (a) shall be provided orally and in writing during any solicitation of an insurance product or annuity to a consumer. The disclosures required by subdivision (b) shall also be made orally and in writing at the time the consumer applies for an extension of credit in connection with which an insurance product or annuity will be solicited, offered, or sold.

(2) If a sale of an insurance product or annuity is conducted by mail, a covered person is not required to make the oral disclosures required by subdivision (a). If a covered person takes an application for credit by mail, the covered person is not required to make the oral disclosures required by subdivision (b).

(3) If the sale of an insurance product or annuity is conducted by telephone, a covered person shall provide the written disclosure required by subdivision (a) by mail within three business days, beginning on the first business day after the sale, but excluding Sundays and the legal public holidays specified in subsection (a) of Section 6103 of Title 5 of the United States Code.

(4) Subject to the requirements of subsection (c) of Section 101 of the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c)), a covered person may provide the written disclosures required by subdivisions (a) and (b) through electronic media instead of paper, if the consumer affirmatively consents to receiving the disclosures electronically and if the disclosures are provided in a format that the consumer may retain or obtain later, for example, through printing or storing electronically by downloading. Any disclosures required by subdivision (a) or (b) that are provided by electronic media are not required to be provided orally.

(5) The disclosures provided shall be conspicuous, simple, direct, readily understandable, and designed to call attention to the nature and significance of the information provided. For example, a covered person may use the following disclosures in visual media, including television, broadcasting, ATM screens, billboards, signs, posters, and written advertisements and promotional materials, as appropriate and consistent with subdivisions (a) and (b):

(A) “NOT A DEPOSIT.”

(B) “NOT FDIC-INSURED.”

(C) “NOT INSURED BY ANY FEDERAL GOVERNMENT AGENCY.”

(D) “NOT GUARANTEED BY THE BANK (OR SAVINGS ASSOCIATION).”

(E) “MAY GO DOWN IN VALUE.”

(6) (A) A covered person shall provide the disclosures required by subdivisions (a) and (b) in a meaningful form. Examples of the types of methods that could call attention to the nature and significance of the information provided include all of the following:

(i) A plain language heading to call attention to the disclosure.

(ii) A typeface and type size that are easy to read.

(iii) Wide margins and ample line spacing.

(iv) Boldface or italics for key words.

(v) Distinctive type style, and graphic devices, such as shading or sidebars, when the disclosures are combined with other information.

The disclosures required by subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be in the same language as principally used in any oral solicitation leading to the execution of the purchase by the consumer of the insurance product or annuity.

(B) A covered person has not provided the disclosures in a meaningful form if the covered person merely states to the consumer that the required disclosures are available in printed material, but does not provide the printed material when required and does not orally disclose the information to the consumer when required.

(C) With respect to disclosures made through electronic media for which paper or oral disclosures are not required, the disclosures are not meaningfully provided if the consumer may bypass the visual text of the disclosures before purchasing an insurance product or annuity.

(7) A covered person shall obtain from the consumer, at the time the consumer receives the disclosures required by subdivisions (a) and (b), or at the time of initial purchase by the consumer of the insurance product or annuity, a written acknowledgment by the consumer that the consumer received the disclosures. A covered person may permit a consumer to acknowledge receipt of the disclosures electronically or in paper form. If the disclosures required under subdivisions (a) and (b) are provided in connection with a transaction that is conducted by telephone, a covered person shall do the following:

(A) Obtain an oral acknowledgment of receipt of the disclosures and maintain sufficient documentation to show that the acknowledgment was given.

(B) Make reasonable efforts to obtain a written acknowledgment from the consumer.

(d) The disclosures described in subdivision (a) are required in advertisements and promotional material for insurance products or annuities unless the advertisements or promotional material are of a general nature describing or listing the services or products offered by the depository institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 203, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

763.

(a) A depository institution shall, to the extent practicable, keep the area where the depository institution conducts transactions involving insurance products or annuities physically segregated from areas where retail deposits are routinely accepted from the general public, identify the areas where insurance products or annuity sales activities occur, and clearly delineate and distinguish, with appropriate signage, those areas from the areas where the depository institution’s retail deposit-taking activities occur.

(b) Any person who accepts deposits from the public in an area where those transactions are routinely conducted in the depository institution may refer a customer who seeks to purchase an insurance product or an annuity to a qualified person who sells that product only if the person making the referral receives no more than a one-time nominal fee of a fixed dollar amount for each referral that does not depend on whether the referral results in a transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 203, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

764.

A depository institution may not permit any person to sell or offer for sale any insurance product or annuity in any part of its office or on its behalf, unless the person is at all times appropriately qualified and licensed as required by this code with regard to the specific products being sold or recommended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 203, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

765.

The commissioner may adopt reasonable regulations necessary to administer this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 203, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.3. Agents and Brokers [769. - 769.56.]

769.

(a) After a written agency or written brokerage contract, where the broker-agent represents the insurer, has been in effect for at least one year, it shall not be terminated or amended by an insurer, except by mutual agreement, unless 120 days’ advance written notice has been given by the insurer to the broker-agent.

(b) The advance notice required by this section does not apply if the broker-agent has done any of the following:

(1) Exceeded his or her binding authority under the agency or brokerage contract.

(2) Violated the written underwriting rules or regulations of the insurer, a copy of which has been provided to the broker-agent, which misleads the insurer concerning the nature or extent of a risk.

(3) Failed to comply with the fiduciary requirements set forth in Section 1733, 1734, 1734.5, or 1735.

(4) Failed, either within 10 days after written notice upon failure to remit funds within the time limits set forth in the agency or brokerage contract or within 30 days after written demand if the agency or brokerage contract does not set forth time limits, to remit funds due and owing to the insurer.

(5) Had his or her license suspended or revoked by the commissioner.

(6) Engaged in fraudulent acts affecting his or her relationship with the insurer or its insureds.

(7) Transferred ownership, control, or servicing of policies written with the insurer to another insurer, or to an entity directly or indirectly owned or controlled by an insurer or to an entity directly or indirectly owning or controlling an insurer.

(c) When a broker-agent’s contract is terminated as provided by this section, the rights, duties, and obligations set forth in the terminated contract of the broker-agent having property rights in renewals shall continue solely with respect to policies then in force or renewed as provided by this section until those policies are canceled in accordance with law, placed by the broker-agent with another insurer, or have expired. The broker-agent’s authority during the period following notice of termination of his or her contract shall be governed by the written contract between the broker-agent and the insurer, except that, after the receipt of the notice of termination, the broker-agent shall not bind new risks on behalf of the insurer, renew policies except as permitted by this section, or otherwise increase the obligation of the insurer, without the express approval of the insurer or in accordance with the terms of an existing policy.

(d) If a terminated broker-agent is unable, after making a good faith effort, to place existing policies with another insurer, the insurer then insuring the risk shall, at the broker-agent’s request, renew any insurance contract written by the broker-agent for the insurer for one policy term or a period of one year, whichever is shorter. Where the insurer is prohibited by subdivision (c) of Section 1861.03 from nonrenewing the risk, the insurer shall continue to compensate the broker-agent for servicing the policies written by the insurer prior to termination of the broker-agent relationship until the insurer can cancel or nonrenew the policyholder pursuant to statute or the broker-agent moves the policyholder to another insurer but, in no event, shall the insurer’s obligation to compensate the broker-agent exceed three years after termination of the broker-agent’s contract, unless otherwise provided by terms of the contract. The renewal shall be at the insurer’s premium rates in effect on the date of renewal and at prevailing commission rates for that class or line of business in effect on the date of renewal for broker-agents whose contracts are not terminated. An insurer shall not be precluded from paying a commission to a terminated broker-agent pursuant to this section at a level the insurer is paying at the time it provides notice to the broker-agent that it is terminating the contract or as set forth in the written agreement, providing that there has not been any unilateral change in the commission paid by the insurer within 180 days of the notice of the broker-agent’s termination. An insurer shall be allowed to subtract from the three-year time period provided to a broker-agent upon termination, the time period that elapsed during which the broker-agent is involved in a rehabilitation program with an insurer.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no insurer shall be required to renew any policy of insurance or compensate a terminated broker-agent pursuant to the provisions of this section if any of the following apply:

(A) The broker-agent is no longer the broker-agent of record with respect to the policy, or the broker-agent has transferred ownership, control, or servicing of policies written with the insurer to another insurer or an entity owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by another insurer or to an entity owning or controlling, directly or indirectly, another insurer.

(B) The broker-agent has died or has become unable to conduct his or her business affairs.

(C) The broker-agent has failed, either within 10 days after written demand upon failure to remit funds within the time limits set forth in the agency or brokerage contract or within 30 days after written demand if the agency or brokerage contract does not set forth time limits, to remit funds due and owing to the insurer.

(D) The broker-agent has failed to follow the written instructions of the insurer, a copy of which has been provided to the broker-agent, generally applicable to the renewal of policies.

(E) The commissioner has determined that the renewal of the policy would threaten the solvency of the insurer.

(F) The insurer suffers the withdrawal of reinsurance covering all or part of the risk and this withdrawal of reinsurance is likely to threaten, in the opinion of the commissioner, the financial integrity or solvency of the insurer.

(G) The insurer has withdrawn from the State of California in accordance with Sections 1070 to 1076, inclusive.

(2) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to authorize the nonrenewal of a good driver discount policy as defined and issued pursuant to the provisions of Sections 1861.02, 1861.025, and 1861.03.

(f) This section shall not apply to a life insurer, an agent of a life insurer, a disability insurer, a nonprofit hospital service plan, an agent of a disability insurer or nonprofit hospital service plan, an agent who is the employee of an insurer, or to an agent who, by contractual agreement either represents only one insurer or group of affiliated insurers or who is required by contract to submit risks to a specified insurer or group of affiliated insurers prior to submitting them to other insurers.

(g) This section does not apply to any management contract of a managing general agent as defined in Section 1735, but it shall continue to apply to any agency or brokerage contract of a managing general agent or any portion of a management contract authorizing a managing general agent to act in his or her capacity as an insurance agent as defined in Section 1621, or an insurance broker as defined in Section 1623.

(h) (1) For purposes of this section, a “rehabilitation program” shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Written communication to the broker-agent outlining the fact that the broker-agent is on rehabilitation status.

(B) Identification by the company of problem areas.

(C) Mutual agreement on performance objectives and specific dates for accomplishment.

(D) Length of rehabilitation plan to be negotiated, but not less than six months.

(2) For purposes of subdivision (d), a good faith effort is satisfied by a terminated broker-agent who markets his or her book of business to other insurers that underwrite the same or similar lines of insurance, consistent with the interests of the policyholders. An insurer who terminates a broker-agent shall be entitled to be informed of the marketing activity and to obtain copies of any correspondence reflecting these efforts. However, nothing in this section shall be interpreted to allow the insurer to require the terminated broker-agent to obtain written rejections of an agency appointment from other insurers, or written rejections from individual policyholders.

(i) An insurer that takes action, other than terminating the written agency or brokerage contract, solely for the purpose of avoiding the provisions of subdivision (a) shall be required to extend existing policies pursuant to the applicable provision of subdivision (d) if both of the following apply:

(1) The action is designed to impact only a specific agency or agencies and the business produced by them.

(2) The action results in the cancellation or nonrenewal of substantially all of the agency’s or agencies’ business.

(j) This section shall apply to written agency contracts becoming effective on or after January 1, 1987. The amendments to this section by the act adding this sentence also apply to any written agency contract amended after January 1, 1988.

(k) The amendments to this section made by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to any written brokerage contract becoming effective, or amended, on or after January 1, 1996.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 753, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

769.1.

A commission payable to a broker-agent shall be at the rate and in accordance with the terms agreed to in writing between the insurer and the broker-agent. There is a rebuttable presumption that a commission is lawful if it complies with the requirements of subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 769 and subdivision (a) of Section 1861.16 and if it is paid in accordance with the written agreement. The written agreement shall be consistent with Part 2 (commencing with Section 1549) of Division 3 of the Civil Code.
 The presumption established by this section is a presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence. This section applies to a written agreement entered into or modified on or after January 1, 2019.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 879, Sec. 1.   (AB 2844)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

769.2.

(a) In determining the amount of an insurer’s rollback obligation pursuant to Section 1861.01 or any regulations promulgated to implement this section, each insurer shall be given full credit for all premium taxes, commissions, and brokerage expenses that the insurer actually paid during the rollback period. No insurer shall be required or permitted to seek, directly or indirectly, reimbursement from the state of any premium taxes paid on premiums earned during the rollback period or reimbursement from any employee or third-party contractor of an insurer of any compensation paid to them for services rendered during the rollback period.

(b) The provisions of this section and the findings and declarations in support thereof take effect immediately upon enactment and apply to any order, settlement agreement, consent decree, or any other resolution of an insurer’s rollback obligation pursuant to Section 1861.01 that occurs after the effective date of this section.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be deemed in any regulatory or judicial proceeding or for any other purpose to constitute legislative intent to endorse or approve any regulations on the issue of Proposition 103 rollback refunds.
